Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,103
Missouri Basin Natural Resources Council; authorized.

For purposes of fostering interstate cooperation and coordination between the states listed in section 2-32,102 on matters relating to natural resources, when two or more of such states agree to participate in any agreement pursuant to section 2-32,102, Nebraska may participate in the formation of a Missouri Basin Natural Resources Council, which is hereby authorized.

Laws 1985, LB 705, § 2.